Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202661-401
Act, how cited.

Sections 61-401 to 61-405 shall be known and may be cited as the Jobs and Economic Development Initiative Act and may also be referred to as the JEDI Act.

Laws 2022, LB1023, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 348.